Maine, session 132, LD1761.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 201-B is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 201-B
INDEMNIFICATION IN CONTRACTS
§1120-E. Indemnification agreements against public policy
1. Indemnification void and unenforceable. A provision, clause, covenant or
agreement contained in, collateral to or affecting a contract that purports to indemnify or
hold harmless the promisee from or against any negligence, claim or liability arising out of
an intentional act or omission of the promisee or promisor, or an agent, servant, employee
or independent contractor of the promisee or promisor, is against the public policy of the
State and is void and unenforceable.
2. Additional insured not prohibited. This section does not prohibit an agreement
or requirement in a contract from including the promisee as an additional insured in an
insurance contract.
3. Exception. This section does not affect the validity of an insurance contract for
workers' compensation or any other insurance contract or agreement issued by an insurer
licensed to engage in the business of insurance in this State.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to contracts entered into or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026.